trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="b/arn__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~arn / ~arnet / ~ørn / ~ørnene -->
  <e>       <p><l>arn</l>       <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnet</l>     <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørn</l>       <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørnene</l>    <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="søn__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen / ~ner / ~nerne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nerne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aft/en__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen | (~enen) / ~ner | ( ~ener) / ~nerne  | (~enerne) -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enen</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ener</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nerne</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enerne</l>    <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sodavand__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ | (~er) / ~ene | (~erne) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skib__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="udtryk__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ene -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cover__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="blod__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mørke__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="smør__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~ret / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="politi__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="strøm__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~men / ~me / ~mene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="band__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~s | (~) / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="calcium__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~met / # / #; uncountable-->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tin__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~net / # / #; uncountable-->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="januar__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~; uncountable-->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="cover">           <i>cover</i><par n="cover__n"/></e>
<e lm="aften">           <i>aft</i><par n="aft/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="barn">            <i>b</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="vidunderbarn">    <i>vidunderb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="småbarn">         <i>småb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="søn">             <i>søn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="nabobord" a="PT">              <i>nabobord</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tryk" a="MLO"><i>tryk</i><par n="udtryk__n"/></e>
<e lm="ansvar">          <i>ansvar</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="august">          <i>august</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="band">            <i>band</i><par n="band__n"/></e>
<e lm="punkband">        <i>punkband</i><par n="band__n"/></e>
<e lm="husband">         <i>husband</i><par n="band__n"/></e>
<e lm="rockband">        <i>rockband</i><par n="band__n"/></e>
<e lm="danseband">       <i>danseband</i><par n="band__n"/></e>
<e lm="vand" c="vandet"> <i>vand</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="vand" c="en (soda)vand"><i>vand</i><par n="sodavand__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuldioxid">       <i>kuldioxid</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="zink">            <i>zink</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="barnebarn">       <i>barneb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="beboelsesejendom"><i>beboelsesejendom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="egeblad">         <i>egeblad</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="bly">             <i>bly</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="brænde">          <i>brænde</i><par n="mørke__n"/></e>
<e lm="bøn">             <i>bøn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="calcium">         <i>calcium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="dagblad">         <i>dagblad</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="december">        <i>december</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="dødsdom">         <i>dødsdom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="fattigdom">       <i>fattigdom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="februar">         <i>februar</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="kirketårn">       <i>kirketårn</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="helium">          <i>helium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="hilsen">          <i>hils</i><par n="aft/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="hun">             <i>hun</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="januar">          <i>januar</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="jod">             <i>jod</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="juni">            <i>juni</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="kadmium">         <i>kadmium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalium">          <i>kalium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="kristendom">      <i>kristendom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="fastland">        <i>fastland</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="litium">          <i>litium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="læder">           <i>læder</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="lærdom">          <i>lærdom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="magnesium">       <i>magnesium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="marts">           <i>marts</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="mørke">           <i>mørke</i><par n="mørke__n"/></e>
<e lm="oktober">         <i>oktober</i><par n="januar__n"/></e>
<e lm="peber">           <i>peber</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="politi">          <i>politi</i><par n="politi__n"/></e>
<e lm="show">            <i>show</i><par n="band__n"/></e>
<e lm="silicium">        <i>silicium</i><par n="calcium__n"/></e>
<e lm="skab">            <i>skab</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="skam">            <i>skam</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="smør">            <i>smør</i><par n="smør__n"/></e>
<e lm="sodavand">        <i>sodavand</i><par n="sodavand__n"/></e>
<e lm="spædbarn">        <i>spædb</i><par n="b/arn__n"/></e>
<e lm="svigersøn">       <i>svigersøn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="sønnesøn">        <i>sønnesøn</i><par n="søn__n"/></e>
<e lm="sygdom">          <i>sygdom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
<e lm="tin">             <i>tin</i><par n="tin__n"/></e>
<e lm="tusmørke">        <i>tusmørke</i><par n="mørke__n"/></e>
<e lm="tværskib">        <i>tværskib</i><par n="skib__n"/></e>
<e lm="uldtøj">          <i>uldtøj</i><par n="blod__n"/></e>
<e lm="visdom">          <i>visdom</i><par n="strøm__n"/></e>
